New Jersey, session 221, S1977.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Department of the Treasury, on behalf of the Department of Corrections, is authorized to sell and convey, as surplus real property, a portion of the States interest within the former Woodbridge Development Center property located at 1291 Rahway Avenue in the Township of Woodbridge, County of Middlesex, which contains 2.321  acres of two non-contiguous lands and improvements thereon also known as Block 867, Lot 1.012.  The property shall be sold and conveyed to the Township of Woodbridge for the appraised value of $910,000. b.    The sale and conveyance authorized by subsection a. of this section shall be executed in accordance with the terms and conditions approved by the State House Commission. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.